Alaska, session 34, SB100.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 11.46 is amended by adding a new section to read: 05 Sec. 11.46.115. Organized theft. (a) A person commits the crime of organized 06 theft if the person individually or jointly violates AS 11.46.120 or 11.46.130 in 07 coordination with a group of three or more persons who have committed or attempted 08 to commit two or more violations of AS 11.46.120 or 11.46.130 for the benefit of, at 09 the direction of, or in association with the group. 10 (b) Organized theft is a class A felony. 11 * Sec. 2. AS 11.46.130(a) is amended to read: 12 (a) A person commits the crime of theft in the second degree if the person 13 commits theft as defined in AS 11.46.100 and 14 (1) the value of the property or services is $750 or more but less than 01 $25,000; 02 (2) the property is a firearm or explosive; 03 (3) the property is taken from the person of another; 04 (4) the property is taken from a vessel and is vessel safety or survival 05 equipment; 06 (5) the property is taken from an aircraft and the property is aircraft 07 safety or survival equipment; 08 (6) the value of the property is $250 or more but less than $750 and, 09 within the preceding five years, the person has been convicted and sentenced on two 10 or more separate occasions in this or another jurisdiction of 11 (A) an offense under AS 11.46.120, or an offense under 12 another law or ordinance with similar elements; 13 (B) a crime set out in this subsection or an offense under 14 another law or ordinance with similar elements; 15 (C) an offense under AS 11.46.140(a)(1), or an offense under 16 another law or ordinance with similar elements; or 17 (D) an offense under AS 11.46.220(c)(1) or (c)(2)(A), or an 18 offense under another law or ordinance with similar elements; or 19 (7) the property is 20 (A) an access device; 21 (B) [OR] identification document; or 22 (C) medical records or other medical information. 23 * Sec. 3. AS 11.46.140(a) is amended to read: 24 (a) A person commits the crime of theft in the third degree if the person 25 commits theft as defined in AS 11.46.100 and 26 (1) the value of the property or services is $250 or more but less than 27 $750; [OR] 28 (2) [REPEALED] 29 (3) [REPEALED] 30 (4) the value of the property is less than $250 and, within the preceding 31 five years, the person has been convicted and sentenced on three or more separate 01 occasions in this or another jurisdiction of theft or concealment of merchandise, or an 02 offense under another law or ordinance with similar elements; or 03 (5) the property is mail. 04 * Sec. 4. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 05 read: 06 APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to offenses committed on or after the effective 07 date of this Act. 08 * Sec. 5. This Act takes effect July 1, 2025. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.